Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1918
Report; contents.

On or before October 15 of each year, the Inspector General shall provide to the Legislature and the Governor a report that includes a summary of reports and investigations made under the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act for the preceding year. The report to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically and filed with the Clerk of the Legislature. The reports shall include findings and recommendations and an update on the status of recommendations made in prior reports, if any. The findings and recommendations may address issues discovered through investigations, audits, inspections, and reviews by the office that will (1) increase accountability and legislative oversight of the Nebraska correctional system, (2) improve operations of the department and the Nebraska correctional system, (3) deter and identify fraud, abuse, and illegal acts, and (4) identify inconsistencies between statutory requirements and requirements for accreditation. The reports shall not contain any confidential or identifying information concerning the subjects of the reports and investigations.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-918;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 62;

Laws 2026, LB1155, § 7.
July 18, 2026